Massachusetts, session 194th, H700.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 94 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(v) The board shall require commonwealth virtual schools to make free lunches available
to all students regardless of household income. Virtual schools shall maximize access to federal
funds for the cost of breakfast and lunch by adopting: (i) the federal Community Eligibility
Provision or Provision 2, pursuant to section 72A; or (ii) other applicable federal provisions,
including, but not limited to, the Healthy, Hunger-Free Kids Act of 2010, Public Law 111-296.
The department shall reimburse the difference between the amount paid by the United States
Department of Agriculture and the free rate as set annually by the United States Secretary of
Agriculture under 42 U.S.C. 1759a for each school.
of 1